Utah statutes.
13-34-104.   Prohibited acts -- Exceptions -- Responsibilities of
proprietary schools.
(1)  Except as provided in this chapter, a proprietary school may not offer,
sell, or award a degree or any other type of educational credential unless the
student has enrolled in and successfully completed a prescribed program of
study as outlined in the proprietary school's catalogue.
(2)  The prohibition described in Subsection (1) does not apply to:
(a)  honorary credentials clearly designated as such on the front side of a
diploma; or
(b)  certificates and awards by a proprietary school that offers other
educational credentials requiring enrollment in and successful completion of a
prescribed program of study in compliance with the requirements of this
chapter.
(3)  A proprietary school must provide bona fide instruction through student-
faculty interaction.
(4)  A proprietary school may not enroll a student in a program unless the
proprietary school has made a good-faith determination that the student has
the ability to benefit from the program.
(5)  A proprietary school may not make or cause to be made any oral, written,
or visual statement or representation that an institution described in
Subsection 13-34-107(2)(a)(ii) knows or should know to be:
(a)  false;
(b)  deceptive;
(c)  substantially inaccurate; or
(d)  misleading.
(6)  The division shall establish standards and criteria by rule made in
accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, for
the following:
(a)  the awarding of educational credentials;
(b)  bona fide instruction through student-faculty interaction; and
(c)  determination of the ability of a student to benefit from a program.
